Mississippi statutes. Title 77. Public Utilities and Carriers
Article 5. Electric Power Associations.
§ 77-5-237.
Disposing of corporate property.

A corporation may sell, lease, exchange or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of its property only if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

The proposed purchaser shall file with the board of directors of the corporation and the Public Service Commission a disclosure statement containing the information required by Schedule 14D-1, as such schedule is described in the United States Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. For purposes of this section, references in Schedule 14D-1 to “tender offer,” “bidder,” “subject company” and “securities of the subject company” shall be deemed to mean the proposed transaction, the proposed purchaser, the corporation and the property of the corporation, respectively.

The proposed purchaser shall file with the board of directors and the Public Service Commission the offer to acquire all, or substantially all, of the property of the corporation, and any amendments thereto, which shall be contained in a written proposal and sets forth completely the terms and conditions of the proposed transaction. The offer shall provide: (i) for the full payment of equity and capital credits to all past and present members of the corporation, on an equitable basis; and (ii) for the payment or assumption of the total debt of the corporation by the purchaser or the payment of the total debt by the board of directors of the corporation, and an agreement to comply with the terms and conditions of any contract or other agreement, other than total debt paid out of the purchase price, to which the corporation is a party or by which the corporation is bound. Should the offer be accepted, the board of directors shall be responsible for assuring that any debts to be paid by the corporation pursuant to the offer of purchase are paid out of the purchase price, and all funds or any other forms of payment are equitably distributed within one hundred twenty (120) days to all past and present members of the corporation according to the amount of interest such members have in such corporation.

(i) When the proposed purchase price is at least equal to two-thirds (2/3) of the members’ equity plus total debt the board of directors shall be obligated to submit the proposed offer to the membership for a vote, unless action is pending or injunctions issued pursuant to subsection (2). Members’ equity shall consist of the appraised value of the assets to be disposed of, less total debt.

When the proposed purchase price is not at least equal to two-thirds (2/3) of the members’ equity plus total debt the board of directors shall not submit such offer of purchase unless the board of directors, by a two-thirds (2/3) affirmative vote, determines that good and sufficient reasons exist so that the submission of an offer of lesser value would be in the best interest of the membership. Members’ equity shall consist of the appraised value of the assets to be disposed of, less total debt.

The board of directors of the corporation and the proposed purchaser shall mutually employ a recognized, qualified impartial firm to make an appraisal of the value of the members’ equity in the tangible and intangible assets to be disposed of and a rate study to determine the effect of the proposed transaction on the rates for electricity to be paid by members. Within fifteen (15) days after it has been determined that the purchaser and the corporation cannot mutually agree on an appraiser, the board of directors of the corporation shall submit, to the Public Service Commission, a list of five (5) independent, qualified individuals or firms recognized with experience in the appraisal of electric utility systems. The purchaser shall have ten (10) days after submission to strike up to four (4) of the appraisers submitted. If more than one (1) appraiser remains on the list, the Public Service Commission shall, within ten (10) days of receipt of such list, notify the corporation and the proposed purchaser of the name of the appraiser selected to perform the appraisal and rate study required herein. The proposed purchaser shall place into escrow the sum of Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) at the time the offer is made. Such escrowed funds shall be released to pay the incurred costs of such studies, with any remainder being returned to the purchaser.

(i) When the conditions set forth in subsections (1)(a) through (1)(d) have been satisfied, and no action is pending or injunction issued pursuant to subsection (2), the corporation shall, within one hundred twenty (120) days, but not sooner than sixty (60) days, call a meeting of the members for purposes of considering and voting on the proposed transaction, upon at least twenty (20) days’ notice of such meeting to the members given in accordance with applicable law and the charter of incorporation and bylaws of the corporation. The notice shall set forth the date, time, location and purpose of meeting, a description of the proposed transaction including the results of the studies required by subsection (1)(d), proxy material and any other information required by the bylaws of the corporation.

When the conditions set forth in subsections (1)(a) and (1)(b) of this section have been satisfied, no court action is pending under the provisions of this section and the board of directors of the corporation has not submitted the offer to the members, upon the expiration of one hundred twenty (120) days but not more than two hundred forty (240) days, thirty percent (30%) of the membership of the corporation may petition the board of directors to submit the offer to the members. Upon receipt of such petition, the corporation shall, within one hundred twenty (120) days, but not sooner than sixty (60) days, call a meeting of the members for purposes of considering and voting on the proposed transaction, upon at least twenty (20) days’ notice of such meeting to the members given in accordance with applicable law and the charter of incorporation and bylaws of the corporation. The notice shall set forth the date, time, location and purpose of meeting, a description of the proposed transaction including the results of the studies required by subsection (1)(d), proxy material and any other information required by the bylaws of the corporation.

The proposed transaction must be approved by the affirmative vote of three-fifths (3/5) of all the members. Voting shall be in person or by proxy. The tabulation of the member vote shall be attested to by an independent accounting firm engaged to perform that accounting function.

If the board of directors determines that any of the terms and conditions of the proposed transaction are unreasonable or unfair to the members and if the proposed purchaser is unwilling to amend the offer to make the terms and conditions of the offer reasonable and fair to the members, then the board of directors may institute a proceeding in the chancery court of the county where the corporation’s principal office is located to enjoin the proposed transaction. If the court determines that the terms and conditions of the proposed offer are unreasonable or unfair to the members, it shall permanently enjoin the proposed transaction, unless the offer is amended to make the terms and conditions reasonable and fair to the members. If the court determines that the terms and conditions of the offer are reasonable and fair to the members, the court shall order the corporation to submit the proposed transaction to the members for a vote. The court may appoint one or more independent experts to review the terms and conditions of the proposed transaction and make a recommendation to the court. Such independent experts shall have the powers described in the order appointing them, or in any amendment thereto. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as prohibiting or limiting the rights of the members of the corporation from acting pursuant to subsection (1)(e)(ii) of this section.

Any party which, in providing the disclosure information required by subsection (1)(a) above, makes false or misleading statements concerning material facts or omits information which makes the information disclosed misleading shall be liable to the members of the corporation for actual damages.

Purchasers, affiliates, cooperatives or agents thereof shall conduct a diligent investigation to secure all material information reasonably available and any purchaser, affiliate, cooperative or agent thereof which, in making any communication with members of the corporation, written or oral, knowingly makes false or misleading statements concerning material facts or omits information which makes the information misleading may be liable to the injured party for damages incurred thereby.

It shall be deemed a breach of the fiduciary duty owed by a director of the corporation to the corporation and its members for any director of the corporation, directly or indirectly, to accept any payment, compensation, remuneration or benefit paid by, or on behalf of, any purchaser or affiliate of a purchaser except for the benefits received by all members of the corporation on a nondiscriminatory basis.

The board of directors may, without authorization by the members, sell, mortgage, lease or otherwise encumber or dispose of (a) any of its property which, in the judgment of the board, is neither necessary nor useful in operating and maintaining the corporation’s system and which in any one (1) year shall not exceed ten percent (10%) in value of all of the property of the corporation, or (b) merchandise. The board of directors of the corporation, without authorization by the members thereof, shall also have full power and authority upon the affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members constituting the full board to authorize the execution and delivery of a mortgage or mortgages or a deed or deeds of trust upon, or the pledging or encumbering of, any or all of the property, assets, rights, privileges, licenses, franchises and permits of the corporation, whether acquired or to be acquired, and wherever situated, as well as the revenues and income therefrom, all upon such terms and conditions as the board of directors upon the affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members constituting the full board shall determine, to secure any indebtedness of the corporation to the United States of America or any instrumentality or agency thereof, or to a national financing institution, organized on a cooperative plan for the purpose of financing its members’ programs, projects and undertakings, in which the corporation holds membership.

During the first year of the existence of a corporation its property shall not be sold or leased, wholly or in part, unless the sale or lease shall in addition to any approval required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section be approved by a majority of all persons who have signed customers’ survey forms or otherwise signified in writing their intention to become members of the corporation. All such persons shall be deemed to have a beneficial interest in the affairs of the corporation insofar as the sale or lease of the property of the corporation is concerned and the members of the board are hereby declared to be the trustees of such persons with respect thereto.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5476; Laws, 1936, ch. 184; Laws, 1938, ch. 252; Laws, 1970, ch. 423, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 454, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).

§ 77-5-239.
Power of corporation to incur obligations and liabilities, borrow money, issue notes, bonds, etc.

A corporation shall have the power to incur obligations and liabilities, borrow money, issue notes, bonds, certificates of indebtedness and other obligations, and to enter into contracts of guaranty.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5477; Laws, 1936, ch. 184; Laws, 1970, ch. 423, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 387, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 77-5-241.
Interest rates.

Any note, bond, or other indebtedness issued by a corporation may bear such interest rate or rates as may be determined by the board of directors of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5477.5; Laws, 1970, ch. 423, § 3; Laws, 2016, ch. 387, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 77-5-243.
Power to execute and deliver instruments to create security interest in corporation property.

A corporation shall have the power to execute and deliver any of one or more mortgages, deeds of trust, financing statements, or other instruments to secure debt covering, or to create by other means a security interest in, any or all of the real or personal property assets, rights, privileges, licenses, franchises, and permits of the corporation or any interest therein, as well as the revenues therefrom, whether acquired or to be acquired wherever situated, for the purpose of securing the payment or performance of any one or more contracts, notes, bonds, or other obligations of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5478; Laws, 1936, ch. 184; Laws, 2016, ch. 387, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 77-5-245.
Purchase and cancellation of bonds.

A corporation shall have power out of any funds available therefor to purchase any bonds issued by it at a price not exceeding the principal amount thereof and accrued interest thereon. All bonds so purchased shall be canceled.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5479; Laws, 1936, ch. 184.

§ 77-5-247.
Monies of corporations.

All monies of a corporation from whatever source derived, shall be deposited or prudently invested in one or more banks, trust companies, or financial institutions, as may be approved by the board of directors, and, if the corporation shall so require, each of such accounts shall be continuously secured by a pledge of direct obligations of the United States of America or of the State of Mississippi having an aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, at all times at least equal to the balance on deposit in such account or accounts, or otherwise insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation by whatever mechanism the corporation’s board may deem appropriate.

Such securities shall either be deposited with the corporation or held by a trustee or agent satisfactory to the corporation. In lieu of any such pledge or such securities, said deposits may be secured by a surety bond or bonds which shall be in form, sufficiency and substance satisfactory to the corporation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5484; Laws, 1936, ch. 184; Laws, 2016, ch. 387, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 77-5-249.
Corporations and their property subject to taxation.

A corporation and its property shall be taxed and assessed in accordance with the laws of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 5486; Laws, 1936, ch. 184; Laws, 2016, ch. 387, § 19, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 77-5-251.
Construction of article; article complete in itself.

This article is to be liberally construed, and the enumeration of any object, power, manner, method or thing shall not be deemed to exclude like or similar objects, purposes, powers, manners, methods or things.

This article is complete in itself and shall be controlling. The provisions of any other law, general, special or local, except as provided in this article, shall not limit or restrict the powers of any corporation formed under this article.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 5487, 5489; Laws, 1936, ch. 184.

§ 77-5-253.
Annual financial and compliance audits.

All corporations created under this article shall submit annual financial and compliance audits to the Mississippi Public Service Commission and Public Utilities Staff for review and archiving.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 454, § 3; Laws, 2009, ch. 546, § 20; Laws, 2016, ch. 387, § 20, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 77-5-255.
Mediation of disputes between members or customers and electric power associations.

Subject to the limitations herein, the Public Service Commission shall investigate, review and mediate any dispute which qualifies as specified herein between a member or customer and the corporation of which he is a member. The minimum amount of a dispute which shall qualify for mediation under this section shall be: (a) One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) which has accumulated over the past twelve (12) months or (b) ten percent (10%) of the cumulative previous twelve (12) months’ billing, whichever shall be the lesser. Investigation, review and mediation shall be commenced upon the filing of a petition with the Public Service Commission by a corporation or a member or customer of a corporation; provided, however, that the Public Service Commission shall not commence any proceedings nor commence any investigation, review or mediation of any such dispute until it has first been notified by both the member and the corporation of their consent to the investigation, review and mediation.The Public Service Commission also shall not commence any proceedings nor commence any investigation, review or mediation pursuant to such petition if at the time of filing the petition suit has been filed in any court of this state or of the United States with regard to the subject matter of the dispute and in which such corporation and member or customer are parties.Any such petition shall be immediately dismissed if any such suit is filed after filing of the petition with the commission.

In anymediation proceedings commenced under the provisions of this section, the Public Service Commission may, by order entered on its minutes and delivery of a certified copy thereof to the corporation, direct the corporation and the member or customer to provide the Public Service Commission with copies of all statements, accounts and reports concerning the dispute which the Public Service Commission may require. The Public Service Commission is further authorized to conduct and may conduct, or request the Public Utilities Staff to conduct, investigation and mediation of the dispute and may negotiate with the corporation and the member or customer for the resolution thereof.In every mediation proceeding under this section the Public Service Commission may perform only such duties relating to the dispute as it deems reasonable and likely to result in settlement of the dispute between the corporation and the member or customer.

Participation and continued participation in any investigation, proceeding, negotiation or mediation under the provisions of this section shall be voluntary by the corporation and the member or customer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1989, ch. 454, § 4; Laws, 2016, ch. 387, § 21, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 77-5-256.
Generation and transmission cooperative; definitions; amendment of certificate of incorporation; board of directors; corporate purpose; applicability of certain provisions of Chapter 3, Title 77.

As used herein, the phrase “generation and transmission cooperative” or “G&T cooperative” shall mean a corporation that is formed under this article for the primary purpose of providing wholesale power supply to its members as a wholesale power supply cooperative, and whose membership is comprised of a group of corporations that are formed under this article and have certificates of public convenience and necessity providing the exclusive right and authority to provide retail electric service within their respective certificated service territories.

The following additional provisions apply to G&T cooperatives:

A G&T cooperative may amend its certificate of incorporation to change its corporate name, to increase or reduce the number of its directors, or to change any other provisions therein. Notwithstanding any provisions of a G&T cooperative’s certificate of incorporation to the contrary and notwithstanding any provisions of Section 77-5-215, a G&T cooperative may amend its certificate of incorporation if the amendment is authorized by the board of directors of the G&T cooperative pursuant to the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds (2/3) of the directors. In the event an amendment is authorized in accordance with the foregoing, a certificate reflecting the amendment to the certificate of incorporation shall be prepared and executed by the president and by the secretary of the G&T cooperative who shall both affirm therein, under oath, that they have been authorized by the G&T cooperative to execute and file such certificate. Such certificate of amendment shall then be filed by the G&T cooperative in the Office of the Secretary of State, who shall forthwith cause this certificate to be handled in the manner prescribed in Section 77-5-211 for original certificates of incorporation; and the amendment of the G&T cooperative’s certificate or articles of incorporation shall be effective as of the date on which the certificate of amendment is filed with the Secretary of State, and the powers specified in the certificate of amendment shall thereupon be vested in the G&T cooperative without further formalities.

A G&T cooperative shall have a board of directors, and the powers of the G&T cooperative shall be vested in and exercised by such board of directors. The directors of the G&T cooperative, other than those named in a certificate of incorporation, shall be elected by the members of the G&T cooperative. The board of directors shall include two (2) directors from each member of the G&T cooperative, with one of those directors being the general manager or chief executive of the member and the other being a sitting director on the member’s board of directors. The bylaws of a G&T cooperative may also provide for up to three (3) at-large directors to be elected by sitting members of the board of directors, with such qualifications to be an at-large director within the discretion of the board of directors. All directors shall be elected for a term of three (3) years, or for such other term(s) as may be prescribed by the corporation’s certificate of incorporation. The directors shall be entitled to reimbursement for expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties. In addition to causing the G&T cooperative to reimburse directors for expenses, the board may authorize compensation and benefits to be paid to and on behalf of such directors for the performance of their duties including for the time it takes for them to travel to and from meetings and to board functions. The board shall elect periodically from its own number officers as prescribed by the corporation’s bylaws. Directors may elect to attend the board meetings by telephone or video conference. The board may set procedures by which its meetings will be conducted and rule will be by majority vote except where a super majority is required by its articles of incorporation or bylaws.

The corporate purpose of a G&T cooperative shall be to render service primarily to its members. After initial incorporation, any corporation formed or operating under this article may become and remain a member if such corporation is accepted into membership by a unanimous vote of the board of directors and complies with the terms and conditions in respect to membership contained in the bylaws of such G&T cooperative. The membership fee of the G&T cooperative shall be fixed by the board of directors. A G&T cooperative may provide capacity, energy, or transmission to a regional transmission market, and independent system operator, or other similar organized market, to the extent provision of such service is expected to provide a direct or indirect benefit to the G&T cooperative’s membership. A G&T cooperative has the power to operate across state lines.

A G&T cooperative has the power to provide support to its members in their operations, including, but not limited to, accounting, legal, regulatory, engineering, and other areas in which its members determine it is desirable for the generation and transmission corporation to house certain expertise.

These provisions are in addition to those applicable to corporations formed or operating under this article that are not G&T cooperatives and are not to be construed as limitations on the powers or authorities of G&T cooperatives in comparison to corporations that are not G&T cooperatives.

It is hereby recognized that generation and transmission cooperatives are subject to rules, regulations and requirements from the Rural Utilities Service, the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, and the North American Electric Reliability Corporation, as well as the rules and requirements of regional transmission organizations to which they belong and to competitive pressures from the wholesale market. In order to clarify the extent to which a generation and transmission cooperative is subject to regulation by the Mississippi Public Service Commission pursuant to Section 77-3-5, the Legislature declares that a generation and transmission cooperative is only subject to the provisions of Sections 77-3-11, 77-3-13, 77-3-14, 77-3-23, 77-3-25 and 77-3-27, and also subject to the provisions of Section 77-3-45, and any rules promulgated thereby to the extent such rules are necessary for the Mississippi Public Service Commission to carry out its responsibilities under such code sections. The policy objectives identified in Section 77-3-2 and the definitions provided in Section 77-3-3 shall be applicable to such code sections listed above as applied to generation and transmission cooperatives.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 436, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 77-5-257.
TVA jurisdiction.

It is hereby recognized that certain corporations formed or operating under this article have entered into contracts with the Tennessee Valley Authority for the purchase of wholesale electric power and that the operations, facilities, services and rates of such corporations are thereby subject to extensive regulation by the Tennessee Valley Authority. In order to avoid the inefficiencies and confusion caused by duplicative, overlapping and conflicting jurisdiction and regulations, it is hereby declared that the Mississippi Public Service Commission and political subdivisions of the state shall not have jurisdiction over and shall not regulate those portions or aspects of a corporation’s operations, facilities, services, or rates that are regulated by the Tennessee Valley Authority. In the event of a dispute between the Mississippi Public Service Commission (commission) and the Tennessee Valley Authority (TVA) over the existence or scope of TVA’s regulatory authority, the commission shall defer to TVA’s asserted authority unless and until the commission has obtained a favorable, final, and nonappealable declaratory judgment against TVA in a court of competent jurisdiction. In any such suit, the commission shall not force a corporation(s) to incur legal fees and expenses by naming them as a party, though a corporation shall maintain the right to seek voluntary intervention under the rules of the court in which the action is pending.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 387, § 22, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 77-5-259.
Limitation for billing errors.

In any action or regulatory proceeding arising from any overbilling or underbilling by a corporation, no collection, reimbursement, or other relief may be awarded for underbillings or overbillings occurring more than six (6) years prior to the commencement of the action or regulatory proceeding.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 387, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 2016.